Arkansas, session 2025, SB195.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. REAPPROPRIATION - CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS - SKILLS
DEVELOPMENT FUND. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of
Commerce, to be payable from the Skills Development Fund, for the Department
of Commerce - Office of Skills Development the following:
(A) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (B) of Section 2 of Act 112 of 2024, for personal services, operating
expenses, payment of debt service, construction, acquisition, equipment, and
grants for comprehensive statewide workforce development programs, in a sum
not to exceed ...................................................$28,000,000.
(B) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (C) of Section 2 of Act 112 of 2024, for personal services, operating
expenses, equipment and grants for comprehensive statewide workforce
development programs, in a sum not to exceed ....................$40,000,000.

SECTION 2. REAPPROPRIATION - MINORITY AND WOMEN-OWNED BUSINESS LOAN
MOBILIZATION. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Commerce,
*MAH027*
02/04/2025 10:12:08 AM MAH027

SB195
to be payable from the Minority and Women-Owned Business Loan Mobilization
Revolving Fund, for the Department of Commerce - Arkansas Economic
Development Commission the following:
(A) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (A) of Section 3 of Act 112 of 2024, for promoting the development of
minority business enterprises in the State, increasing the ability of
minority business enterprises to compete for state contracts, and sustaining
the economic growth of minority business enterprises in the State, in a sum
not to exceed ......................................................$153,216.

SECTION 3. REAPPROPRIATION - CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS, GRANTS AND
PROGRAMS. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Commerce, to be
payable from the Development and Enhancement Fund, for the Department of
Commerce - Arkansas Economic Development Commission the following:
(A) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (A) of Section 5 of Act 112 of 2024, for the purpose of providing
grants and/or loans to state agencies, cities, counties, community-based non-
proft organizations and other entities determined by the Department of
Commerce - Arkansas Economic Development Commission to be eligible to: (1)
undertake public works projects and/or job training efforts which support
private sector job creation opportunities; (2) alleviate conditions which
constitute a threat to public health and wellbeing; (3) partially defray the
cost of providing access to publicly owned industrial parks, and/or
technology parks; (4) provide for the expansion of the aircraft and aerospace
industry; (5) provide for port, rail and waterway economic development
projects; (6) provide for technology based economic development projects; (7)
provide for industrial site development costs (including, but not limited to
land acquisition, construction, renovation, and equipment acquisition); (8)
provide for development of intermodal facilities (including, but not limited
to port and/or waterway projects, rail spur construction and/or road and
highway improvement); (9) pay the costs of environmental mitigation projects;
(10) provide for construction and/or improvement of water and sewer systems,
in a sum not to exceed ..........................................$3,000,000.
(B) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (B) of Section 5 of Act 112 of 2024, for funding for grants and/or
loans to state agencies, cities, counties, community-based non-proft
02/04/2025 10:12:08 AM MAH027

SB195
organizations and other eligible entities to support economic stimulus
activities throughout the state, in a sum not to exceed ............$480,320.
(C) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (C) of Section 5 of Act 112 of 2024, for grant matching funds and/or
loans to state agencies, cities, counties, community-based non-profit
organizations and other eligible entities applying for consideration with a
granting organization that requires matching funds for projects, to maximize
contributions, provide cash assistance, or match contributions to ensure
grant funding or contract, in a sum not to exceed .................$189,757.
(D) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (D) of Section 5 of Act 112 of 2024, for the purpose of providing
grants and/or loans to state agencies, cities, counties, community-based non-
profit organizations and other entities determined by the Arkansas Economic
Development Commission to be eligible to: (1) undertake public works projects
and/or job training efforts which support private sector job creation
opportunities; (2) alleviate conditions which constitute a threat to public
health and wellbeing; (3) partially defray the cost of providing access to
publicly owned industrial parks, and/or technology parks; (4) provide for the
expansion of the aircraft and aerospace industry; (5) provide for port, rail
and waterway economic development projects; (6) provide for technology based
economic development projects; (7) provide for industrial site development
costs (including, but not limited to land acquisition, construction,
renovation, and equipment acquisition); (8) provide for development of
intermodal facilities (including, but not limited to port and/or waterway
projects, rail spur construction and/or road and highway improvement); (9)
pay the costs of environmental mitigation projects; (10) provide for
construction and/or improvement of water and sewer systems, in a sum not to
exceed .............................................................$375,000.
(E) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (E) of Section 5 of Act 112 of 2024, for allocation by the Executive
Director of the Economic Development Commission for activities associated
with the implementation of the State's strategic plan for economic
development, in a sum not to exceed ................................$130,100.

SECTION 4. DISBURSEMENT CONTROLS. (A) No contract may be awarded nor
obligations otherwise incurred in relation to the project or projects
02/04/2025 10:12:08 AM MAH027

SB195
described herein in excess of the State Treasury funds actually available
therefor as provided by law. Provided, however, that institutions and
agencies listed herein shall have the authority to accept and use grants and
donations including Federal funds, and to use its unobligated cash income or
funds, or both available to it, for the purpose of supplementing the State
Treasury funds for financing the entire costs of the project or projects
enumerated herein. Provided further, that the appropriations and funds
otherwise provided by the General Assembly for Maintenance and General
Operations of the agency or institutions receiving appropriation herein shall
not be used for any of the purposes as appropriated in this act.
(B) The restrictions of any applicable provisions of the State
Purchasing Law, the General Accounting and Budgetary Procedures Law, the
Revenue Stabilization Law and any other applicable fiscal control laws of
this State and regulations promulgated by the Department of Finance and
Administration, as authorized by law, shall be strictly complied with in
disbursement of any funds provided by this act unless specifically provided
otherwise by law.

SECTION 5. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

SECTION 6. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the General
Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the
appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on July 1,2025 is essential to the operation of the
agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the
event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the effective
date of this Act beyond July 1,2025 could work irreparable harm upon the
proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs.
Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being
02/04/2025 10:12:08 AM MAH027

SB195
necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and
safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1,2025.


































02/04/2025 10:12:08 AM MAH027